Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202054-1173
Livestock Auction
Market Fund; license and permit fees; occupation tax; use.

The license
and permit fees collected as provided by the Livestock Auction Market Act
are an occupation tax and shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit
to the Livestock Auction Market Fund. All money so collected shall be appropriated
to the uses of the Department of Agriculture for the purpose of administering
such act and shall be paid out only on vouchers approved by the director and
upon the warrant or warrants issued by the Director of Administrative Services.
Any unexpended balance in such fund at the close of any biennium shall, when
reappropriated, be available for the uses and purposes of the fund for the
succeeding biennium.

Laws 1963, c. 319, § 17, p. 969;

Laws 1969, c. 584, § 54, p. 2379;

Laws 1995, LB 7, § 58;

Laws 1999, LB 778, § 72;

Laws 2001, LB 197, § 16;

Laws 2014, LB884, § 29.